Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,374
Sections; exclusive treatment.

The provisions of sections 60-6,363 to 60-6,374 shall be exclusive and prevail over other provisions of law in this state or any of its subdivisions applied to smoke from diesel-powered motor vehicles.

Laws 1972, LB 1360, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2212;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 470.